Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 1. In General
§ 27-3-106.
“Employment” defined; employment outside United States; exceptions; “American employer” defined; localized service specified.

Employment under this act includes service performed outside the United States except in Canada and the Virgin Islands by a United States citizen for an American employer if:

The employer’s principal place of business in the United States is located in this state;

The employer has no place of business in the United States and is a resident of this state, a corporation organized under state law or a partnership or trust and the number of partners or trustees resident of this state is greater than the number of residents of any other state;

The employer elected coverage under this act; or

A claim for benefits based on this service is filed under this act and the employer failed to elect coverage in any state.

As used in subsection (a) of this section, “American employer” means a:

Resident of the United States;

Partnership and two-thirds (2/3) or more of the partners are residents of the United States;

Trust and the trustees are United States residents; or

Corporation organized under federal or any state law.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, employment includes service performed in this state, both in and outside this state or in Canada if the service is:

Localized in this state;

Not localized in any state, a part of the service is performed in this state and the base of operations is located in this state or if the base of operations is not located in any state, the individual is a resident of this state; or

Not subject to the law of any state or Canada and the service is directed or controlled from a location in this state.

Service not covered under subsection (c) of this section, performed entirely outside this state and contributions are not required or paid under federal or any state law is employment under this act if the individual performing the service is a resident of this state and the department approves the election of the employing unit for coverage under this act.

Service is localized within a state if it is performed entirely within the state or both within and outside the state if the service performed outside the state is incidental.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 2; 1939, ch. 121, § 1; ch. 124, §§ 1 to 7; 1941, ch. 96, § 2; 1943, ch. 58, §§ 1, 2; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1945, § 54-102; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 1, 2; 1953, ch. 111, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-23; Laws 1959, ch. 105, § 1; 1967, ch. 3, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 216, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 60, § 1; 1971, ch. 96, § 1; ch. 253, §§ 2 to 7; 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Employer-employee relationship. —

See notes under §

27-3-104

.

§ 27-3-107.
“Agricultural labor” defined; “farm” defined; “crew leader” defined; when domestic services included; exception.

As used in this section, “agricultural labor” means remunerated service performed:

On a farm for any person involving cultivating the soil or raising or harvesting any agricultural or horticultural commodity including training and managing livestock, bees, poultry, wildlife or furbearing animals;

For the owner, tenant or other operator of a farm involving the maintenance of the farm and any tools and equipment if the major part of the service is performed on the farm;

For the operator of a farm in handling, planting, drying, packing, packaging, processing, freezing, grading, storing, delivering to storage or market in its unmanufactured state or delivering to a carrier for transportation to market, any agricultural or horticultural commodity if the operator produced more than fifty percent (50%) of the commodity;

For the operation or maintenance of ditches, canals, reservoirs or waterways used exclusively for supplying and storing water for farming purposes;

In the production or harvesting of an agricultural commodity as defined under 12 U.S.C. § 1141j(g);

For a group of farm operators or a cooperative organization of which the operators are members for services specified under paragraph (iii) of this subsection if the operators produced more than fifty percent (50%) of the commodity. This paragraph does not apply to service involving commercial canning, commercial freezing or any agricultural or horticultural commodity after delivery to a terminal market for distribution for consumption.

As used in subsection (a) of this section, “farm” means stock, dairy, poultry, fruit and furbearing animal operations, truck farms, ranches, nurseries, ranges, orchards, greenhouses and other operations primarily engaged in the raising of agricultural or horticultural commodities.

Agricultural labor is employment under this act [§§

27-3-101

through

27-3-704

] if it is performed for a person who:

Paid cash wages of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) or more during any calendar quarter in the current or preceding calendar year to individuals employed in agricultural labor; or

Employed ten (10) or more individuals in agricultural labor for a part of one (1) day for twenty (20) calendar weeks within the current or preceding calendar year.

For purposes of this section, any member of a crew furnished by a crew leader to perform service in agricultural labor for any other person is an employee of the crew leader if:

The crew leader is certified under 29 U.S.C. 1801 through 1872; or

Substantially all crew members operate or maintain tractors, mechanized harvesting or crop dusting equipment or other mechanized equipment provided by the crew leader; and

The individual is not an employee of any other person under W.S.

27-3-104

through

27-3-108

.

As used in this section, “crew leader” means an individual who:

Furnishes individuals to perform agricultural labor for any other person;

Pays for himself or for others the cash wages of individuals furnished by him for agricultural labor; and

Has not entered into a written agreement with the other person designating the individuals as employees of that person.

If an individual furnished by a crew leader to perform agricultural labor for another person is not an employee of the crew leader pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, the other person is the employer and shall pay cash wages of the individual equal to the amount paid by the crew leader for the service performed for that person.

Employment under this act includes domestic service performed for a person in a private home, local college club or local chapter of a college fraternity or sorority for which cash wages of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more are paid for any calendar quarter of the current or preceding calendar year.

Service performed during any period in which exemptions from federal unemployment tax liability are provided for under 26 U.S.C. § 3306(c)(1)(B) including any amendments or extensions thereto, by an alien admitted to the United States to perform service in agricultural labor under 8 U.S.C. §§ 1101 through 1503, is exempt from this section.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 2; 1939, ch. 121, § 1; ch. 124, §§ 1 to 7; 1941, ch. 96, § 2; 1943, ch. 58, §§ 1, 2; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1945, § 54-102; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 1, 2; 1953, ch. 111, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-23; Laws 1959, ch. 105, § 1; 1967, ch. 3, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 216, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 60, § 1; 1971, ch. 96, § 1; ch. 253, §§ 2 to 7; 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; ch. 131, § 3; 1985, ch. 175, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “12 U.S.C. § 1141j(g)” for “12 U.S.C. § 1141(g)” in (a)(v).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Employer-employee relationship. —

See notes under §

27-3-104

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 27-3-108.
Services excluded from scope of employment.

Employment under this act does not include service performed:

By an individual for his spouse or child or by a person under twenty-one (21) years of age for his parent or for a partnership consisting only of his parents;

For the federal government or any federal agency exempt from this act by federal constitution, except service for those agencies otherwise required by law to contribute to any state unemployment compensation fund;

For an employer or employee representative defined under 45 U.S.C. § 351 et seq. unless an agreement is in effect pursuant to W.S.

27-3-608

;

By an individual under the age of eighteen (18) or as a direct seller or independent contractor in the business of distributing or delivering newspapers or shopping news excluding the delivery or distribution at any point for further delivery or distribution but including directly related services such as soliciting customers and collecting receipts, provided:

All or substantially all of the individual’s pay for the service, whether or not paid in cash, directly relates to sales or other output rather than to the number of hours worked; and

The individual performs the service under a written contract with the newspaper or shopping news publisher which specifies that the individual will not be treated as an employee with respect to the services for federal tax purposes.

As real estate activity under W.S. 33-28-102(b)(xlv) by a responsible broker, associate broker or salesperson licensed under the Real Estate License Act, W.S.

33-28-101

through

33-28-401

;

In the employ of a school, college or university by a student enrolled and regularly attending the school, college or university or by the spouse of a student if the spouse is informed at the time employed that employment is provided under a financial assistance program and the employment is not covered by unemployment compensation;

By an individual enrolled in a full-time program of an educational institution combining academic instruction with work experience if the service is an integral part of the program and is certified by the institution to the employer. This paragraph does not apply to service performed in a program established for an employer or group of employers;

By a hospital patient employed by the hospital;

In a barber shop licensed under W.S.

33-7-108

or salon licensed under W.S.

33-12-127

if:

Use of shop facilities by an individual performing services is contingent upon payment of a flat rate of compensation to the shop owner; and

The individual performing services receives no compensation from the shop owner for services performed.

By an individual who is the owner and operator of a motor vehicle which is leased or contracted with driver to a for-hire common or contract carrier. The owner-operator shall not be an employee for purposes of this act if he performs the service pursuant to a contract which provides that the owner-operator shall not be treated as an employee for purposes of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, the Social Security Act, the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and income tax withholding at source;

Services performed as casual labor;

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 66, § 2.

By a member of a limited liability company, unless the limited liability company elects coverage in accordance with W.S. 27-3-502(d).

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 2; 1939, ch. 121, § 1; ch. 124, §§ 1 to 7; 1941, ch. 96, § 2; 1943, ch. 58, §§ 1, 2; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1945, § 54-102; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 1, 2; 1953, ch. 111, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-23; Laws 1959, ch. 105, § 1; 1967, ch. 3, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 216, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 60, § 1; 1971, ch. 96, § 1; ch. 253, §§ 2 to 7; 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1985, ch. 175, § 2; 1995, ch. 121, § 2; 1997, ch. 93, § 1; 2005, ch. 98, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2010, ch. 66, § 2; 2013 ch. 152, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2018 ch. 6, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in the introductory language in (a)(ix), substituted “salon” for “a beauty shop.”

The 2008 amendment,

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, repealed (a)(xii), which read: “By a private duty nurse employed by a private party.”

The 2013 amendment,

added “or as a direct seller or independent contractor in the business of” and added the ending language beginning “but including directly related services,” making a related change in (a)(iv); and added (a)(iv)(A) and (B).

Laws 2013, ch. 152, §
2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, rewrote (a)(v),
which read: “by a
licensed real estate broker or salesman
receiving as sole compensation
a commission based on the sale or
rental of real estate.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Federal law. —

The Federal Insurance Contributions Act is codified as 26 U.S.C.S. § 3101 et seq.

The Social Security Act is codified as 42 U.S.C.S. § 301 et seq.

The Federal Unemployment Tax Act is codified as 26 U.S.C.S. § 3301 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

§ 27-3-109.
Amendment and repeal; vested rights denied.

The legislature reserves the right to amend, modify or repeal all or any part of the Wyoming Employment Security Law [§§

27-3-101

through

27-3-704

] at any time. There is no vested private right of any kind under this act [§§

27-3-101

through

27-3-704

].

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 50, § 1.